Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.aff
SFX Y Y 192
SFX Y   zar  cei          zar
SFX Y   uar  üei          guar
SFX Y   r    u            ir
SFX Y   r    u            er
SFX Y   r    stes         guir
SFX Y   r    stes         er
SFX Y   r    stes         ar
SFX Y   r    stes         [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    ses          guir
SFX Y   r    ses          er
SFX Y   r    ses          ar
SFX Y   r    ses          [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    sen          guir
SFX Y   r    sen          er
SFX Y   r    sen          ar
SFX Y   r    sen          [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    se           guir
SFX Y   r    se           er
SFX Y   r    se           ar
SFX Y   r    se           [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    ndo          ir
SFX Y   r    ndo          er
SFX Y   r    ndo          ar
SFX Y   r    i            er
SFX Y   r    i            ar
SFX Y   r    dos          guir
SFX Y   r    dos          ar
SFX Y   r    dos          [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    do           guir
SFX Y   r    do           ar
SFX Y   r    do           [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    das          guir
SFX Y   r    das          ar
SFX Y   r    das          [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    da           guir
SFX Y   r    da           ar
SFX Y   r    da           [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    che          guir
SFX Y   r    che          er
SFX Y   r    che          ar
SFX Y   r    che          [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    bas          ar
SFX Y   r    ban          ar
SFX Y   r    ba           ar
SFX Y   r    as           guir
SFX Y   r    as           [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    an           guir
SFX Y   r    an           [^auü]ir
SFX Y   r    a            guir
SFX Y   r    a            [^auü]ir
SFX Y   ir   i            guir
SFX Y   ir   i            [^auü]ir
SFX Y   ir   ístes        [aü]air
SFX Y   ir   ístes        [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   íses         [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   íses         [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   ísen         [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   ísen         [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   ísemos       ir
SFX Y   ir   ísedes       ir
SFX Y   ir   íse          [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   íse          [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   íron         [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   íron         [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   íres         [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   íres         [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   íren         [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   íren         [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   íras         [ü]air
SFX Y   ir   íras         [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   íran         [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   íran         [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   íramos       ir
SFX Y   ir   írades       ir
SFX Y   ir   íra          [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   íra          [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   ídos         [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   ídos         [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   ído          [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   ído          [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   ídas         [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   ídas         [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   ída          [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   ída          [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   íche         [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   íche         [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   ías          [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   ías          [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   ían          [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   ían          [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   íamos        ir
SFX Y   ir   íades        ir
SFX Y   ir   ía           [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   ía           [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   í            [aü]ir
SFX Y   ir   í            [^g]uir
SFX Y   ir   in           ir
SFX Y   er   ídos         oer
SFX Y   er   ído          oer
SFX Y   er   ídas         oer
SFX Y   er   ída          oer
SFX Y   er   ías          oer
SFX Y   er   ían          oer
SFX Y   er   íamos        er
SFX Y   er   íades        er
SFX Y   er   ía           oer
SFX Y   er   ésemos       er
SFX Y   er   ésedes       er
SFX Y   er   éramos       er
SFX Y   er   érades       er
SFX Y   er   in           er
SFX Y   er   idos         [^o]er
SFX Y   er   ido          [^o]er
SFX Y   er   idas         [^o]er
SFX Y   er   ida          [^o]er
SFX Y   er   ias          [^o]er
SFX Y   er   ian          [^o]er
SFX Y   er   ia           [^o]er
SFX Y   car  quei         car
SFX Y   ar   ásemos       ar
SFX Y   ar   ásedes       ar
SFX Y   ar   áredes       ar
SFX Y   ar   áramos       ar
SFX Y   ar   ábamos       ar
SFX Y   ar   ábades       ar
SFX Y   ar   uei          gar
SFX Y   ar   ou           ar
SFX Y   ar   ei           [^g]uar
SFX Y   ar   ei           [^cguz]ar
SFX Y   0    íamos        ir
SFX Y   0    íamos        er
SFX Y   0    íamos        ar
SFX Y   0    íades        ir
SFX Y   0    íades        er
SFX Y   0    íades        ar
SFX Y   0    ás           ir
SFX Y   0    ás           er
SFX Y   0    ás           ar
SFX Y   0    án           ir
SFX Y   0    án           er
SFX Y   0    án           ar
SFX Y   0    á            ir
SFX Y   0    á            er
SFX Y   0    á            ar
SFX Y   0    on           guir
SFX Y   0    on           er
SFX Y   0    on           ar
SFX Y   0    on           [^auü]ir
SFX Y   0    mos          ir
SFX Y   0    mos          er
SFX Y   0    mos          ar
SFX Y   0    ias          ir
SFX Y   0    ias          er
SFX Y   0    ias          ar
SFX Y   0    ian          ir
SFX Y   0    ian          er
SFX Y   0    ian          ar
SFX Y   0    ia           ir
SFX Y   0    ia           er
SFX Y   0    ia           ar
SFX Y   0    es           guir
SFX Y   0    es           er
SFX Y   0    es           ar
SFX Y   0    es           [^auü]ir
SFX Y   0    en           guir
SFX Y   0    en           er
SFX Y   0    en           ar
SFX Y   0    en           [^auü]ir
SFX Y   0    emos         ir
SFX Y   0    emos         er
SFX Y   0    emos         ar
SFX Y   0    ei           ir
SFX Y   0    ei           er
SFX Y   0    ei           ar
SFX Y   0    edes         ir
SFX Y   0    edes         er
SFX Y   0    edes         ar
SFX Y   0    des          ir
SFX Y   0    des          er
SFX Y   0    des          ar
SFX Y   0    as           guir
SFX Y   0    as           er
SFX Y   0    as           ar
SFX Y   0    as           [^auü]ir
SFX Y   0    an           guir
SFX Y   0    an           er
SFX Y   0    an           ar
SFX Y   0    an           [^auü]ir
SFX Y   0    a            guir
SFX Y   0    a            er
SFX Y   0    a            ar
SFX Y   0    a            [^auü]ir
