Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.dic
abalandrar/YXp
aballoar/YXMp
abarautar/YXp
abarracañar/YXp
abducir/poYXn
abendizoar/YXp
abisbar/YXp
abocar/pYXM
abolsar/YXp
aborrear/YXp
acertar/YXp
aciganar/YXp
aciquear/YXp
acobertar/YXp
acoller/YXDMp
inadecuar/Y
adoptar/YXCp
agachar/YXp
agrandar/YXp
alcatrear/nYXp
alonxar/YXMp
amortizar/YXp
apavorar/YXp
aquietar/YXDp
artellar/YXSpM
aseverar/YXDpc
atinar/YXp
autorizar/YXpc
axilizar/YpX
barbear/YXp
besbellar/YXp
brotar/pYX
calotear/pYXD
captar/YXpc
catalogar/poYXD
ceivar/pYX
chimpar/YXp
cimentar/YXp
coller/YXRp
comezar/pYXR
reconciliar/Y
consensuar/YXp
consolar/pYX
contrastar/YXp
conxecturar/pYXD
cuestionar/YXDp
danificar/YXDop
debullar/YXDp
defraudar/pYX
depositar/YXp
desistir/pYXn
devorar/nYXDp
dilucidar/YXp
disimular/YXp
dominar/vpYXDnc
duvidar/YXp
embarcar/pYX
emparellar/YXp
emprestar/YXp
encher/YXpn
endurecer/YXp
englobar/YXp
engraxar/YXp
entoar/YXSp
entrincheirar/pYX
enxecar/YXp
escaldar/YXp
escoitar/YXp
esfollar/YXp
espallar/vYXMDp
espoliar/YXDpn
estrelar/YXp
esventrar/pYX
exaxerar/oYXp
exonerar/YXp
exterminar/vYXpDon
fecundar/pYX
filtrar/YXIp
flanquar/YXp
flutuar/pYX
fornecer/YXRp
fraccionar/YXp
fumar/YXp
furar/YXp
galar/YXRp
gavear/YXDp
guerrear/YXp
reimprimir/Y
infravalorar/YXp
inspeccionar/pYX
interceptar/pYX
interpelar/YXop
intrigar/YXp
latexar/YnXp
sublevar/Y
lidar/YXp
localizar/YXpc
malfadar/YXp
manusear/YXMop
mediatizar/YXp
mirar/YXDp
morrer/YXp
necesitar/pYX
ocasionar/pYX
orientar/YXScRp
ousar/YXp
pasmar/YXp
percorrer/YXp
pertencer/pnYX
pesquisar/YXpD
praticar/YXp
premeditar/pYX
prexudicar/YXDpM
profetizar/YXp
quentar/pYXDMx
irradiar/Yc
recopilar/YXcp
refrixerar/YXp
reinar/pYX
reseñar/pYX
rezumar/YXp
roubar/YXp
sacralizar/YXop
saquear/YXDp
seleccionar/YXDp
socar/YXp
sondar/YXp
subscreber/YpX
subxugar/nYXp
supervisar/YXp
tallar/YXpn
teimar/pYX
tirar/nYXpd
tonificar/YXp
subtrair/Y
transportar/YXp
triplicar/pYX
uivar/pYX
vadear/YXp
verbalizar/YXp
viver/nYXp
volver/YXRp
xaquear/YXp
xudicializar/pYX
abalear/pYX
abar/YXp
abarbeitar/YXp
abascallar/YXMp
abazbarrar/YXp
abesoirar/YXp
abiñanzar/pYX
abocetar/YXp
abondar/YXp
absorber/vnYXDMp
acenar/YXp
acinzar/YXMp
acomechar/YXp
acontecer/pYXMv
acubillar/pYXM
adorar/YXpc
aduchar/YXp
afagar/XYMDp
agomar/YXp
alentar/YXDp
alternar/pYX
analisar/YpX
aniñar/YXp
aperceber/pYXM
aprender/YXp
aquelar/YXMp
arrefriar/pYX
asegurar/pcYXDR
asulagar/YXp
atrair/nYXCvM
avaliar/cYXpMv
bailar/YXp
beneficiar/pYX
bordar/YSRXp
calcinar/pnYXo
castizar/YXp
coartar/YXp
complementar/YXdp
conquistar/YXRp
crispar/nYXMcp
deformar/YXp
derrogar/YXp
desviar/YXp
distar/YXp
electrocutar/pYX
empurrar/pYXD
enfolecar/YXp
engrellar/YXp
envenenar/YXp
escavar/pYX
esgotar/pnYXMvD
estabilizar/YXpDn
evoluir/YXC
favorecer/YXMDSp
fornicar/pYX
glosar/pYX
horrorizar/YXp
individualizar/YXp
integrar/pYXR
lambiscar/pYX
loirecer/YXp
meditar/YXCp
mitificar/SYXp
motivar/pYXDc
neutralizar/YXp
orar/YXDpc
padexar/YXDp
pendular/YXp
perverter/YXp
ponderar/YXp
preocupar/cYXSp
proceder/YnpXM
purgar/YXpo
rapar/pYX
recusar/YXp
renunciar/YXp
resplandecer/nYXp
rimar/pYX
saldar/YXp
sesear/YXp
sobrevoar/YXp
supeditar/pYX
tellar/YXp
traizoar/YXp
tratar/YXRp
unir/RYSp
valorar/poYX
vidrar/YXp
abadar/YXp
abandexar/YXp
abastrar/YXp
abetar/YXp
abonar/YXDMpc
abxurar/voYXDpn
acontiar/YXp
adular/cYXDp
agonizar/YXnp
aloular/YpX
amestrar/YXp
anoitecer/YXp
apontar/pYXMS
argüir/YXDvno
asumir/YXp
atropelar/YXp
bracear/YXp
calexar/YXp
carrouchar/YXp
cercar/YXp
coleccionar/YXp
comutar/YXp
constar/YXnp
convencer/pYXM
cuantificar/YXvp
defuntar/YXpC
depilar/YXp
destilar/pYX
distanciar/YXMp
encadear/SYpX
endosar/YXp
engrandar/YXp
enterrar/YXSp
erradicar/YXp
esculcar/YXp
esquiar/YXp
evaporar/YXp
extirpar/YXp
fantasiar/YXDp
focalizar/YXp
funcionar/YXMp
graduar/YXp
implicar/pYX
insistir/nYXp
involucrar/YXp
liquidar/cYXp
masturbar/YXp
merar/pYX
multar/YXp
nevar/YXp
optar/YXCp
parir/YXxnp
perceber/vpYX
pingar/pYX
desposuir/Y
presaxiar/YXp
profesar/YXp
propulsar/YXp
quillar/YXp
rascar/YXp
remecer/YXp
restrinxir/vnYXMp
rodopiar/YXpn
sarar/YXp
sepultar/YXp
socializar/YXp
suceder/YXp
tarifar/YXp
traducir/YXvp
turrar/YXp
variar/vcYXnp
violar/pYXc
xurar/YXMp
abalienar/YXop
abatinar/YXp
abitar/YXRp
abordar/YXDpv
acentuar/YXp
acolmeirar/pYX
acuciar/YXp
aduelar/YXp
agradar/YXSp
alienar/vpYXncD
amargar/YXMp
antecipar/YXpo
armacenar/YXp
arrolar/YXDpM
asovallar/nYXMDp
autodeterminar/vYXcp
brincar/YXpD
carimbar/pYX
chover/YXp
comprobar/YXpc
condensar/YXp
contundir/nYXp
danar/YXp
demandar/pnYX
derramar/YXp
desvairar/YXMp
discriminar/YcXp
dotar/cYXDp
embolsar/YXRp
encarar/YXp
engonzar/YXp
entraxar/pYX
enxergar/YXp
esmagar/YXMpnDv
estabelecer/YXMp
estofar/YXp
evidenciar/YXp
exteriorizar/YXp
feder/YXp
follar/YXp
furtar/pYX
guisar/YXp
reimplantar/Yo
incluir/YX
interiorizar/YXp
izar/YXMp
limar/YXp
lustrar/IYXp
maltratar/pYX
marxinar/pYXoD
merendar/YXp
mostrar/YXp
obxectar/YXCp
ourizar/YXp
pasar/YXRp
perfilar/YXp
pilotar/YXp
poetizar/nYoXp
prescreber/YXp
provisionar/pYX
racionalizar/YXp
reconfortar/pYXn
repenicar/YXp
retroceder/YXp
rir/pYK
salvagardar/YXp
singrar/YXp
suministrar/YXp
tachar/pYX
torrar/YXp
truncar/YXp
vedar/YXp
vixiar/YXp
xunxir/YXp
abaldoar/YXp
abastionar/YpX
abetumar/YXp
aborrecer/vYXDMp
acitrinar/pYX
acondizoar/pYX
adulterar/pYDXc
aflorar/pYX
alastrar/YXMp
ampliar/pYXcv
aplicar/YXvpc
arder/YXpn
arrotar/YpXD
augurar/YXIp
bater/YRXp
calcular/YXDvp
cesar/YXnpcM
colocar/pYXc
comprimir/pYX
condoer/pYX
converter/YXp
curar/YXp
derribar/YXp
desexar/vYXpn
determinar/pYXI
disgregar/YXp
dormir/YnDp
embebedar/pYX
empreñar/YXp
engaratuxar/YXp
ensaiar/YXp
equiparar/YXp
escoucear/YXp
estimular/YXnop
exclamar/YXpc
fadigar/YXp
fluir/YXIR
gacear/YXp
goldrar/pYX
guindar/YXp
ignorar/pYX
incrustar/YXp
ingresar/YXRp
interactuar/YXp
laiar/YXp
luarexar/YXp
maxinar/IcYXp
mocear/pYX
ofertar/YXp
osmar/pYX
patentear/YXp
permanecer/YXp
petrificar/YXpo
potenciar/YXpo
proclamar/YXop
pulular/YXp
ramificar/pYX
reclamar/YXpc
repatriar/YXp
retroalimentar/pYX
rubir/YXp
saravelar/YXp
simular/YXop
solenizar/YXp
sulfurar/pYX
tipificar/YXp
transcreber/YXp
trucar/YXp
ventar/IYXp
visionar/YXp
xustificar/YXcp
